Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6151XS (3) 91 ss/ns S.F. 2134 Section 1. Section 99B.45, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 2 lieu thereof the following: 3 a. Card and parlor games, including but not limited to 4 poker, pinochle, pitch, gin rummy, bridge, euchre, hearts, 5 cribbage, dominoes, checkers, chess, backgammon, pool, and 6 darts. 7 Sec. 2. Section 99F.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 8 following new subsections: 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 23A. âPoker card roomâ means a gambling 10 structure licensed under this chapter that offers poker games 11 to the public but does not offer sports wagering, other forms 12 of gambling games pursuant to this chapter, or pari-mutuel 13 wagering pursuant to chapter 99D. 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 23B. âPoker variantâ means any form of 15 poker using playing cards, including but not limited to Texas 16 hold âem, Omaha, seven-card stud, razz, draw poker, and any 17 other recognized poker game or variation approved by the 18 commission by rule. 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 27A. âRakeâ means a fee charged by the 20 operator of a poker card room for providing the poker game, 21 collected from each pot or on a length-of-time basis, not to 22 exceed limits established by the commission by rule. 23 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 99F.5B License to operate poker card 24 room. 25 1. A person may apply to the commission for a license to 26 operate a poker card room as provided in this section. 27 2. A poker card room may offer any poker variant to persons 28 twenty-one years of age or older. 29 3. A poker card room may charge a rake as provided by the 30 commission by rule. The commission shall establish maximum 31 rake percentages or structures to ensure fairness and prevent 32 excessive fees. 33 4. The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34 17A for the licensing, operation, and regulation of, and the 35 -1- LSB 6151XS (3) 91 ss/ns 1/ 2 S.F. 2134 collection of taxes imposed pursuant to section 99F.11 from, 1 poker card rooms, including but not limited to licensing 2 fees, background checks, facility standards, game integrity, 3 recordkeeping, anti-money laundering measures, and consumer 4 protection. Licensing fees collected under this subsection 5 shall be deposited in the general fund of the state. 6